Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-930
Baccalaureate professional, defined.

Baccalaureate professional shall mean those degree programs intended by an institution to prepare an individual for certification or licensure by a national-, regional-, or state-level certifying or licensing agency. Such programs include but are not limited to: (1) Engineering; (2) education; (3) allied health professions; (4) nursing; and (5) architecture.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 14.